src/fst/stems/nouns.lexd
## Nouns
#  -----
## Nouns in the Hiligaynon language are things.

LEXICON Noun_Root
adlaw # "day"
amay # "father"
anak # "child"
asawa # "wife"
babaye # "woman"
balay # "house"
banwa # "city"
bata # "child, kid"
butang # "thing"
duta # "land, dirt"
ginuo # "lord"
hari # "king"
iloy # "mother"
kamot # "hand"
kan-on # "rice"
kaugalingon # "self"
lalaki # "man"
langit # "sky, heaven"
lawas # "body"
libro # "book"
mangga # "mango"
mata # "eye"
pamilya # "family"
saging # "banana"
sabat # "answer"
sala # "sin, mistake"
tawo # "person"
tigulang # "elder"
tubig # "water"
tao # "person"
tawo # "person"
tuig # "year"
dios # "God"
